test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_4st_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    čurgiistâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurgiistâđâm
    čurmâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurmâdâđâm
    čurmâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čurmâdât
    čurmâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurmâttâđâm
    čuáguttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáguttâđâm
    čuárvuđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuárvuđâđâm
    čuáskudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskudâlâm
    čuáskudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskudâđâm
    čuáskudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuáskudât
    čájádâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájádâđâm
    varriidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: varriidâđâm
    adelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adelâđâm
    ahevâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ahevâšâm
    addiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: addiittâlâm
    addiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: addiittâl
    agâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: agâstâlâm
    agâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: agâstâl
    almaaštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almaaštâlâm
    almottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almottâlâm
    avâštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: avâštâlâm
    ađđiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ađđiistâlâm
    cagastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cagastâlâm
    cagastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cagastâl
    ceggiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ceggiistâlâm
    ciegâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciegâstâl
    cuovkkiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuovkkiittâlâm
    cuápcuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuápcuttâlâm
    cuápcuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuápcuttâl
    fierriittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fierriittâlâm
    fijnottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fijnottâlâm
    fáškáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fáškáástâlâm
    hadastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hadastâlâm
    hammiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hammiittâlâm
    havvuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: havvuustâlâm
    heiviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heiviittâlâm
    herskustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: herskustâlâm
    herskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: herskuttâlâm
    hilttiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilttiistâlâm
    himáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: himáttâlâm
    hirmástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hirmástâlâm
    hiärástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiärástâlâm
    hokâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hokâttâlâm
    huiháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huiháttâlâm
    hurgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hurgáttâlâm
    hánástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hánástâlâm
    háputtâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háputtâlâm
    hárjuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárjuttâlâm
    hávskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hávskuttâlâm
    ihastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ihastâlâm
    ijâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ijâstâlâm
    imâštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: imâštâlâm
    irgástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: irgástâlâm
    irâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: irâstâlâm
    iälustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iälustâlâm
    jiäháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiäháttâlâm
    jiänáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiänáttâlâm
    jorgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jorgáttâlâm
    jorgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jorgáttâl
    julástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: julástâlâm
    jurâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurâttâlâm
    jurâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurâttâl
    juvliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juvliistâlâm
    juvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juvâttâlâm
    jáháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jáháttâlâm
    karvattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: karvattâl
    kavâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavâstâlâm
    kašnattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kašnattâlâm
    kejâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kejâstâlâm
    kijvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kijvástâlâm
    kiälástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiälástâlâm
    kiäsáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsáttâlâm
    kiškuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiškuustâlâm
    kištottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kištottâlâm
    koccáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koccáástâlâm
    kolliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolliistâlâm
    korriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korriistâlâm
    korristâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korristâlâm
    korâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korâstâlâm
    kuhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuhâstâlâm
    kumâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kumâttâlâm
    kuorâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorâttâlâm
    kuoskâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuoskâttâlâm
    kuvviistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuvviistâlâm
    kuvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuvâttâlâm
    kuádáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuádáttâlâm
    kuásuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuásuttâlâm
    kuásástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuásástâlâm
    kuáđástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáđástâlâm
    káhvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: káhvástâlâm
    lappuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lappuustâlâm
    lavliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lavliistâlâm
    lađâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lađâstâlâm
    leirâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leirâstâlâm
    lihâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lihâttâlâm
    lijkkuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lijkkuustâlâm
    livkkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: livkkáástâlâm
    liässáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liässáástâlâm
    luoddiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoddiistâlâm
    luvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvâttâlâm
    láškuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láškuttâlâm
    lášmuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lášmuttâlâm
    mainâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mainâstâlâm
    miähástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miähástâlâm
    miäruštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miäruštâlâm
    mohástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mohástâlâm
    monâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâttâlâm
    muhâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muhâttâlâm
    muálháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muálháttâlâm
    muátástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muátástâl
    muštottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštottâlâm
    muštástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštástâlâm
    mučástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučástâlâm
    málástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: málástâlâm
    máttááttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máttááttâlâm
    mávustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mávustâlâm
    mávustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mávustâl
    nabdastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nabdastâlâm
    nijbástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nijbástâlâm
    njomâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njomâstâlâm
    njurgiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njurgiistâlâm
    njurgottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njurgottâlâm
    njuárustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuárustâlâm
    njálgástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njálgástâlâm
    noskáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noskáttâlâm
    nuhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuhâstâlâm
    nurdâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurdâstâlâm
    nurváástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurváástâlâm
    nuáidástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuáidástâlâm
    náguttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: náguttâlâm
    nágáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nágáttâlâm
    omâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: omâttâlâm
    orniistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orniistâlâm
    orostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orostâlâm
    oskottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oskottâlâm
    ovdâháástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovdáháástâlâm
    ovdâháástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovdâháástâlâm
    paldattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paldattâlâm
    parâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: parâttâlâm
    pasniistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pasniistâlâm
    pieggiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pieggiistâlâm
    piergiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piergiittâlâm
    pijpostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pijpostâlâm
    piruttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piruttâlâm
    pisottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pisottâlâm
    piäittáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäittáástâlâm
    piälhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälhástâlâm
    piälháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälháttâlâm
    povvâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povvâstâlâm
    povčâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povčâstâlâm
    pozáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pozáttâlâm
    pozáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pozáttâl
    punjâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâttâlâm
    punnjuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punnjuustâlâm
    punnjuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: punnjuustâl
    purâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâttâlâm
    puáimálâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáimálâstâlâm
    pálustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pálustâlâm
    raiđuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raiđuustâlâm
    rammuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rammuustâlâm
    rantustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rantustâlâm
    rantustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rantustâl
    ripšâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ripšâttâl
    riäváttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riäváttâlâm
    ruŋŋiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruŋŋiittâlâm
    ráhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráhástâlâm
    ráváttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráváttâlâm
    rähistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rähistâlâm
    sahhiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sahhiittâlâm
    savâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: savâstâlâm
    sierriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sierriistâlâm
    siärvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siärvástâlâm
    siäđuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siäđuttâlâm
    skirviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skirviittâlâm
    smietâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smietâstâlâm
    sodâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sodâstâlâm
    sodâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sodâstal
    sovâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovâttâlâm
    sovčástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovčástâl
    spirppáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spirppáástâlâm
    spohhiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spohhiistâlâm
    stuárástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuárástâlâm
    sundáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sundáttâlâm
    suorgâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suorgâttâlâm
    suorgâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suorgâttâl
    suotâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suotâstâlâm
    surguttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: surguttâlâm
    suunâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suunâttâlâm
    sápustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sápustâlâm
    sárnuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sárnuttâlâm
    teltastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teltastâlâm
    tiervâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiervâttâlâm
    tikkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tikkiistâlâm
    tiäđustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäđustâlâm
    tubdâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubdâstâlâm
    tuálvuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuálvuttâlâm
    tálustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tálustâlâm
    tálvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tálvástâlâm
    uhkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uhkáástâlâm
    uináástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uináástâlâm
    ujostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ujostâlâm
    usâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: usâstâlâm
    usâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: usâttâlâm
    uvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uvástâlâm
    uávuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uávuttâlâm
    uáđđáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáđđáástâlâm
    valastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valaštâlâm
    valdâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valdâttâlâm
    vannaastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vannaastâlâm
    varriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: varriistâlâm
    važottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: važottâlâm
    viekkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viekkiistâlâm
    vierriittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierriittâlâm
    vierâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâttâlâm
    vievâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vievâttâlâm
    vijsástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vijsástâlâm
    viäluttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viäluttâlâm
    vižástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vižástâlâm
    vonâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vonâttâlâm
    vuorkkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuorkkiistâlâm
    vuáimáštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáimáštâlâm
    vuáruttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáruttâlâm
    várdáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: várdáástâlâm
    várdáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: várdáástâl
    áhčááttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áhčááttâlâm
    ájáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ájáttâlâm
    árvuštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuštâlâm
    ávhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ávhástâlâm
    ávhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ávhâstâlam
    čarviistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čarviistâlâm
    časkâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: časkâttâlâm
    čibástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čibástâlâm
    čierâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čierâstâlâm
    šiettuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiettuustâlâm
    čievčâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâttâl
    čiävluttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiävluttâlâm
    čiŋâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiŋâttâlâm
    šlaaviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlaaviittâlâm
    šlajâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlajâttâlâm
    čokkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokkáástâlâm
    čokottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokottâlâm
    čorostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čorostâlâm
    čovláttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čovláttâlâm
    čuoigâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuoigâstâlâm
    čuáskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskuttâlâm
    čájáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájáttâlâm
    čáráttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čáráttâlâm
    adaluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adâluuvčâm
    adaluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: adaluhš
    falâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falâluuvčâm
    falâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: falâluš
    hastâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hastâluuvčâm
    hastâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hastâlâhš
    áštáluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áštáluuvčâm
    čulgâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulgâluvčâm
    kađâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kađâdât
    piruluddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pirulud
    purâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâdâđâm
    rahttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rahttâdâm
    vienâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vienâruš
    vierâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâlâtâm
    kužâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kužâdâđâm
    tabadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tabadâlâm
